Washington statutes.
RCW 41.44.120

Prior service credit.

(1) Subject to subsections (4) and (5) of this section the following members shall be entitled to prior service credit:

(a) Each member in service on the effective date.

(b) Each member entering after the effective date if such entry is within one year after rendering service prior to the effective date.

(c) Each member entering in accordance with the provisions and subject to the conditions and limitations prescribed in subsection (5) of this section.

As soon as practicable, the board shall issue to each member entitled to prior service credit a certificate certifying the aggregate length of service rendered prior to the effective date. Such certificate shall be final and conclusive as to his or her prior service unless hereafter modified by the board, upon application of the member.

(2) Each city joining the system shall have the privilege of selecting the rate at which prior service pensions shall be calculated for its employees and may select any one of the three rates set forth below:

(a) 1.33% of final compensation multiplied by the number of years of prior service credited to the member. This rate may be referred to as "full prior service credit."

(b) 1.00% of final compensation multiplied by the number of years of prior service credited to the member. This rate may be referred to as "full prior service credit."

(c) .667% of final compensation multiplied by the number of years of prior service credited to the member. This rate may be referred to as "one-half prior service credit."

(3) The above rates shall apply at the age of sixty-two or over for members included in the miscellaneous personnel and at age sixty or over for members in the uniformed personnel: PROVIDED, That if a member shall retire before attaining either of the ages above referred to, the total prior service pension shall be reduced to the percentages computed and established in accordance with the following tables, to wit:

Miscellaneous Personnel

Percent of Full Prior Service Allowable

Male

Female

Age

Factor

Age

Factor

45

. . . .

65.48

45

. . . .

66.78

46

. . . .

66.86

46

. . . .

67.91

47

. . . .

68.29

47

. . . .

69.09

48

. . . .

69.77

48

. . . .

70.34

49

. . . .

71.28

49

. . . .

71.67

50

. . . .

72.82

50

. . . .

73.10

51

. . . .

74.43

51

. . . .

74.71

52

. . . .

76.13

52

. . . .

76.41

53

. . . .

77.93

53

. . . .

78.21

54

. . . .

79.84

54

. . . .

80.11

55

. . . .

81.86

55

. . . .

82.12

56

. . . .

84.00

56

. . . .

84.24

57

. . . .

86.28

57

. . . .

86.50

58

. . . .

88.69

58

. . . .

88.89

59

. . . .

91.26

59

. . . .

91.42

60

. . . .

94.00

60

. . . .

94.11

61

. . . .

96.90

61

. . . .

96.96

62

. . . .

100.00

62

. . . .

100.00

Percent of Full Prior Service Allowable

Uniformed Personnel

Age

Factor

45

. . . .

69.66

46

. . . .

71.13

47

. . . .

72.65

48

. . . .

74.22

49

. . . .

75.83

50

. . . .

77.47

51

. . . .

79.18

52

. . . .

80.99

53

. . . .

82.91

54

. . . .

84.93

55

. . . .

87.09

56

. . . .

89.37

57

. . . .

91.79

58

. . . .

94.36

59

. . . .

97.09

60

. . . .

100.00

(4) If sickness, injury, or service in the armed forces of the United States during the national emergency identified with World War I or World War II and/or service in the armed forces of the United States of America for extended active duty by any employee who shall have been regularly granted a leave of absence from the city service by reason thereof, prevents any regular employee from being in service on the effective date, the board shall grant prior service credit to such person when he or she is again employed. The legislative authority in each participating city shall specify the amount of prior service to be granted or current service credit to be made available to such employees: PROVIDED, That in no case shall such service credit exceed five years. Certificate of honorable discharge from or documentary evidence of such service shall be submitted to the board before any such credit may be granted or made available. Prior or current service rates, or both, for such employees shall not exceed the rates established for fellow employees.

(5) There shall be granted to any person who was an employee of a private enterprise or a portion thereof which shall be hereafter acquired by a city as a matter of public convenience or necessity, where it is in the public interest to retain the trained personnel of such enterprise or portion thereof, credit for prior service for the period such person was actually employed by such private enterprise, except that this shall apply only to those persons who shall be employees of such enterprise or portion thereof at the time of its acquisition by the city and who remain in the service of such city until the effective date of membership of such person under this chapter.

There shall be granted to any person who was an employee of any state association of cities and towns, which association elects to participate in the retirement system established by this chapter, credit for prior service for the period such person was actually employed by such association, except that this shall apply only to those persons who shall be employees of such association on May 21, 1971.

Credit for such prior service shall be given only if payment for the additional cost of including such service has been made or if payment of such additional cost or reimbursement therefor has been otherwise provided for to the satisfaction of the board or if such person be entitled to any private pension or retirement benefits as a result of such service with such private enterprise, credit will be given only if he or she agrees at the time of his or her employment by the municipality to accept a reduction in the payment of any benefits payable under this chapter that are based in whole or in part on such added and accredited service by the amount of these private pension or retirement benefits received. The conditions and limitations provided for in this subsection (5) shall be embodied in any certificate of prior service issued or granted by the board where any portion of the prior service credited under this subsection is included therein.

The city may receive payments for these purposes from a third party and shall make from such payments contributions with respect to such prior service as may be necessary to enable the fund to assume its obligations.

[ 2012 c 117 s 65; 1971 ex.s. c 271 s 15; 1959 c 70 s 2; 1957 c 158 s 2; 1951 c 275 s 8; 1947 c 71 s 12; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 9592-141.]

NOTES:

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 271: See note following RCW 41.32.260.